incubator/apertium-rup/apertium-rup.rup.dix
    <pardef n="m/aținu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>aținu</l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âținamu</l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âținamu</l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âținai</l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âținatâ</l><r>aținu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/ășcu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>ășcu</l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âșcamu</l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>âșcamu</l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>âșcai</l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>âșcatâ</l><r>ășcu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mb/eciu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>eciu</l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>iciamu</l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>iciamu</l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>icii</l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>icitâ</l><r>eciu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="m/etur__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>etur</l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>ituramu</l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>ituramu</l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>iturai</l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>ituratâ</l><r>etur<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="m"><i>aținu</i><par n="m/aținu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="m"><i>ășcu</i><par n="m/ășcu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="mb"><i>eciu</i><par n="mb/eciu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="m"><i>etur</i><par n="m/etur__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nu"><i>aținu</i><par n="m/aținu__vblex"/></e>
